Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-727
Report; person making; receive summary of findings and actions; when.

Upon request, a physician or the person in charge of an institution, school, facility, or agency making a legally mandated report of child abuse or neglect pursuant to section 28-711 shall receive a summary of the findings of and actions taken by the department in response to his or her report. The amount of detail such summary contains shall depend on the source of the report of child abuse or neglect and shall be established by regulations of the department.

Laws 1979, LB 505, § 15;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 19.